Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. HISTORY, CULTURE, AND EDUCATION

CHAPTER 445. TEXAS STATE HISTORY MUSEUM

Sec. 445.001. MUSEUM. (a) The Bob Bullock Texas State History Museum is established for the purpose of educating and engaging visitors in the exciting and unique story of Texas and displaying objects and information relating to the history of Texas.

(b) The museum shall provide exhibits, programs, and activities that support the education of public school students in the essential knowledge and skills developed and adopted under Chapter 28, Education Code.

(c) The museum is not subject to the provisions of Section 2165.005.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.002. GOVERNANCE. (a) The State Preservation Board shall govern and provide for the operation of the museum.

(b) Except to the extent of conflict with this chapter, the board and the executive director of the board have the same powers and duties in relation to the museum that they have in regard to other facilities and programs under Chapter 443.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1462, Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2001.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1462, Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2001.

Sec. 445.003. VENDING FACILITIES. (a) In addition to exhibits and theaters, the museum may operate:

(1) a gift shop;

(2) food services, including one or more restaurants, cafeterias, and vending machines;

(3) pay station telephones;

(4) automated teller machines (ATMs); and

(5) other services and facilities convenient or necessary for visitors to the museum.

(b) Chapter 94, Human Resources Code, does not apply to vending facilities operated by or approved for operation in the museum.

(c) The museum may provide for the public sale, possession, or consumption of alcoholic beverages on property owned or controlled by the museum.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 243 (H.B. 4964), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 445.004. THEATERS; FILMS AND OTHER PRODUCTS. (a) The museum may operate one or more film theaters, including a large-format theater.

(b) In addition to films connected with Texas history, the museum may exhibit commercially produced entertainment films in museum theaters.

(c) The museum may develop and produce films and other products and may retain royalties or otherwise receive revenue from the production, distribution, exhibition, or sale of those films or products.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.005. MARKETING AND PUBLIC RELATIONS. Marketing and publicity of the museum's exhibits, programs, and activities is essential to the museum's statutory objectives. For that purpose, the museum may:

(1) employ public relations personnel;

(2) publish brochures, books, and periodicals intended for the general public that are promotional, informational, or educational; and

(3) advertise the museum in any available media.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.006. TOURS; PARKING AND TRANSPORTATION. The museum may provide parking for visitors and, in cooperation with other public and private authorities, may participate in providing for tour transportation of visitors between other historical and cultural sites.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.007. PRIVATE EVENTS. (a) The museum may rent all or part of the museum facility at various times for private events. The museum may restrict public access to that part of the facility rented for a private event.

(b) The museum may provide for the sale, gift, possession, and consumption of alcoholic beverages at a private event held in the facility.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.008. INSURANCE. The museum may purchase insurance policies to insure the museum buildings and contents and other personal property against any insurable risk, including insurance covering historical artifacts, art, or other items on loan to the museum.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.009. CONTRACTS. The museum may contract with public or private entities to the extent necessary or convenient to the operation of the museum's exhibits, programs, activities, and facilities, including contracts for the acquisition by purchase or loan of items for exhibition.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.010. PROGRAM AND FACILITY ACCESSIBILITY. The museum shall comply with federal and state laws related to program and facility accessibility. The museum shall prepare and maintain a written plan that describes how a person who does not speak English can be provided reasonable access to the museum's programs and services.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.011. FUNDING. (a) To the extent possible, the costs of operating the museum shall be paid from revenues generated by the museum, but the legislature may appropriate funds for the operation of the museum.

(b) The museum shall solicit and may accept gifts of money or items from individuals and from public or private foundations and organizations.

(c) The museum may set and collect fees in amounts necessary to provide for the operation of the museum, including fees for:

(1) admission to exhibits, theaters, programs, and activities;

(2) parking and transportation; and

(3) facility rental.

(d) The museum may sell at prices set by the museum items manufactured or publications printed under contract with the museum.

(e) All net revenue collected by the museum under this chapter, including the net revenue from vending facilities under Section 445.003, shall be credited to the Bob Bullock Texas State History Museum fund.

(f) The transactions, funds, and programs of the museum are subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321.

(g) The museum may establish a membership program.

(h) Notwithstanding other law, for purposes of Subchapter I, Chapter 659:

(1) the museum is considered an eligible charitable organization entitled to participate in a state employee charitable campaign under Subchapter I, Chapter 659; and

(2) a state employee is entitled to authorize a deduction for contributions to the museum, including contributions for museum membership, as a charitable contribution under Section 659.132, and the museum may use the contributions for museum purposes.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1462, Sec. 9, eff. June 17, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 8.0035, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 445.012. MUSEUM FUND. (a) Money and securities received by the museum shall be held in trust outside the treasury by the comptroller in a special fund to be known as the Bob Bullock Texas State History Museum fund. The museum may spend money received by the museum for any purpose connected with the museum.

(b) The comptroller shall manage and invest the fund on behalf of the museum as directed or agreed to by the museum. Interest, dividends, and other income of the fund shall be credited to the fund.

(c) The museum shall prepare a detailed annual report on the fund. That report must describe the status of the fund, list all donations to the fund, including the name of each donor, and list all disbursements from the fund, including the purpose of each disbursement.

(d) The state auditor, based on a risk assessment and subject to the legislative audit committee's approval of including the review in the audit plan under Section 321.013, may review the annual report on the fund, and any information used in preparing the report as the auditor determines necessary, and shall report any findings or recommendations to the museum and the legislative audit committee.

(e) The fund is not subject to Subchapter F, Chapter 404. A provision of this chapter or other law that provides for the deposit of money or another thing of value into the fund prevails over Subchapter F, Chapter 404.

(f) Subtitle D, Title 10, does not apply to a purchase or lease made with money from the fund.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 445.013. SUPPORT ORGANIZATIONS. The museum may establish and maintain one or more organizations of persons interested in supporting the programs and activities of the museum. Such an organization may be incorporated as a Texas nonprofit corporation.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 15, eff. May 21, 1999.

Sec. 445.014. MUSEUM DIRECTOR. The executive director of the State Preservation Board shall employ a museum director to manage and operate the museum.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 401 (S.B. 201), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 445.015. NAMING OF MUSEUM AREAS. The State Preservation Board shall adopt reasonable policies for naming areas within the museum, including rooms and exhibition halls, in honor of donors or other benefactors, if appropriate.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 401 (S.B. 201), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.